Washington statutes.
RCW 18.250.080

Application procedures, requirements, and fees.

Each applicant and license holder must comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The secretary shall furnish a license to any person who applies and who has qualified under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2007 c 253 s 9.]